New Jersey, session 222, S1465.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   At least once per semester, and as often as the institution determines to be appropriate, a public institution of higher education shall invite and facilitate the presence of the Council on Compulsive Gambling of New Jersey on the institutions campus for the purpose of providing information and resources relevant to compulsive gambling which shall include, but shall not be limited to, information regarding the potential risks associated with gambling, compulsive gambling counseling services, and options for gambling self-exclusion programs. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.